Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF337.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2118YH (1) 91 lh/ko H.F. 337 Section 1. MEDICAID ââ DENTAL WELLNESS PLAN ââ 1 REIMBURSEMENT. The department of health and human services 2 shall require any Medicaid dental plan contractor managing 3 the provision of dental care to Medicaid members through the 4 Medicaid dental wellness plan to align reimbursement rates 5 for dental providers with the reimbursement rates for dental 6 providers under the healthy and well kids in Iowa (Hawki) 7 program under chapter 514I, in order to maximize dental 8 provider participation in and member access to dental services 9 under the Medicaid dental wellness plan. 10